Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) The term "state" means any department, commission, agency, or instrumentality of the state of Washington.

(2) The term "local public agency" applies to any county, city or town, or other municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state and any person who has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law, or any instrumentality of any of the foregoing.

(3) The term "person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.

(4)(a) The term "displaced person" means, except as provided in (c) of this subsection, any person who moves from real property, or moves his or her personal property from real property:

(i) As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire, or the acquisition of, such real property in whole or in part for a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency; or

(ii) On which the person is a residential tenant or conducts a small business, a farm operation, or a business defined in this section, as a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition, or such other displacing activity as the lead agency may prescribe, under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency in any case in which the displacing agency determines that the displacement is permanent.

(b) Solely for the purposes of RCW 8.26.035 (1) and (2) and 8.26.065, the term "displaced person" includes any person who moves from real property, or moves his or her personal property from real property:

(i) As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire, or the acquisition of, other real property in whole or in part on which the person conducts a business or farm operation, for a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency; or

(ii) As a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition, or such other displacing activity as the lead agency may prescribe, of other real property on which the person conducts a business or a farm operation, under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency where the displacing agency determines that the displacement is permanent.

(c) The term "displaced person" does not include:

(i) A person who has been determined, according to criteria established by the lead agency, to be either unlawfully occupying the displacement dwelling or to have occupied the dwelling for the purpose of obtaining assistance under this chapter; or

(ii) In any case in which the displacing agency acquires property for a program or project, any person (other than a person who was an occupant of the property at the time it was acquired) who occupies the property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to termination when the property is needed for the program or project.

(5) The term "business" means any lawful activity, excepting a farm operation, conducted primarily:

(a) For the purchase, sale, lease, and rental of personal and real property, and for the manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, or other personal property;

(b) For the sale of services to the public;

(c) By a nonprofit organization; or

(d) Solely for the purposes of RCW 8.26.035, for assisting in the purchase, sale, resale, manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, personal property, or services by the erection and maintenance of an outdoor advertising display or displays, whether or not such display or displays are located on the premises on which any of the above activities are conducted.

(6) The term "farm operation" means any activity conducted solely or primarily for the production of one or more agricultural products or commodities, including timber, for sale or for home use, and customarily producing such products or commodities in sufficient quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator's support.

(7) The term "comparable replacement dwelling" means any dwelling that is (a) decent, safe, and sanitary; (b) adequate in size to accommodate the occupants; (c) within the financial means of the displaced person; (d) functionally equivalent; (e) in an area not subject to unreasonably adverse environmental conditions; and (f) in a location generally not less desirable than the location of the displaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities, facilities, services, and the displaced person's place of employment.

(8) For purposes of RCW 8.26.180 through 8.26.200, the term "acquiring agency" means:

(a) A state agency or local public agency that has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law; or

(b) Any state agency, local public agency, or person that (i) does not have the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law and (ii) has been designated an "acquiring agency" under rules adopted by the lead agency. However, the lead agency may only designate a state agency, local public agency, or a person as an "acquiring agency" to the extent that it is necessary in order to qualify for federal financial assistance.

(9) The term "displacing agency" means the state agency, local public agency, or any person carrying out a program or project, with federal or state financial assistance, that causes a person to be a displaced person.

(10) The term "federal financial assistance" means a grant, loan, or contribution provided by the United States, except any federal guarantee or insurance and any interest reduction payment to an individual in connection with the purchase and occupancy of a residence by that individual.

(11) The term "mortgage" means such classes of liens as are commonly given to secure advances on, or the unpaid purchase price of, real property, under the laws of this state, together with the credit instruments, if any, secured thereby.

(12) The term "lead agency" means the Washington state department of transportation.

(13) The term "appraisal" means a written statement independently and impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an opinion of defined value of an adequately described property as of a specific date, supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant market information.

[ 2011 c 336 s 280; 2003 c 254 s 1; 1988 c 90 s 2; 1972 ex.s. c 34 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 240 s 2.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.

Application—1972 ex.s. c 34: "Sec. 2. The amendatory language contained in section 1 of this 1972 amendatory act shall apply only to persons displaced after the effective date of this 1972 amendatory act [February 20, 1972]." [ 1972 ex.s. c 34 s 2.]